North Carolina, session 2025, SB421.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The following sections of Article 3 of Chapter 148 of the General
Statutes are repealed:
(1) G.S. 148-26.
(2) G.S. 148-26.1.
(3) G.S. 148-26.5.
(4) G.S. 148-32.2.
(5) G.S. 148-32.3.
(6) G.S. 148-33.
SECTION 2. Article 3 of Chapter 148 of the General Statutes, as amended by
Section 1 of this act, reads as rewritten:
"Article 3.
"Labor of Prisoners.Fair and Rehabilitative Prison Labor Act.
"§ 148-27.1. State policy on employment of incarcerated individuals.
(a) It is the policy of the State of North Carolina that all incarcerated individuals who are
medically and physically fit, as determined by a licensed healthcare professional, may be
*S421-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
provided with voluntary work opportunities that are rehabilitative, workforce-oriented, and fairly
compensated.
(b) Work programs under this Article shall do each of the following:
(1) Prioritize training and skill development in industries with viable employment
opportunities upon release.
(2) Ensure that prison labor is not used to displace non-incarcerated workers,
including migrant and seasonal agricultural workers.
(3) Comply with labor standards set forth in the Prison Industry Enhancement
Certification Program (PIECP), ensuring prevailing wage standards where
applicable.
(4) Offer meaningful vocational education, apprenticeship, and certification
programs.
(5) Establish gender-equitable labor policies, ensuring access to diverse work
opportunities for both male and female incarcerated individuals.
(6) Provide fair compensation, with wages at least equal to the State minimum
wage for PIECP-certified programs and no less than five dollars ($5.00) per
hour for non-PIECP programs.
(7) Ensure incarcerated individuals are provided post-release employment
assistance in collaboration with the North Carolina Department of Commerce,
workforce development boards, and private employers.
"§ 148-27.2. Definitions.
Unless otherwise specified or understood from the surrounding context, the following
definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Division. – The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.
(2) Incarcerated individual. – A person in the custody of the Department of Adult
Correction or any other State or law enforcement agency, often referred to as
an inmate or prisoner.
(3) PIECP. – The Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program.
(4) Secretary. – The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction.
"§ 148-27.3. Prohibition on using prison labor to replace agricultural and private-sector
workers.
(a) No prison labor shall be used to replace, displace, or supplement migrant, seasonal,
or documented agricultural workers who have been affected by State or federal immigration
enforcement actions.
(b) Before approving any prison labor contracts in the agricultural sector, the North
Carolina Department of Labor shall conduct a labor market assessment to confirm a legitimate
labor shortage exists.
(c) Any incarcerated individual engaged in agricultural work shall be compensated at or
above the prevailing wage for agricultural laborers in the State.
(d) Private farms are prohibited from contracting directly with any representative or
entity of the Department of Adult Correction for prison labor.
(e) No later than March 1 and September 1 of each year, the Department of Adult
Correction shall report to the Governor and General Assembly regarding the use of incarcerated
individuals in agricultural labor, including, at a minimum, all of the following information:
(1) Total hours worked by incarcerated individuals during the current and
previous calendar year.
(2) Total and individual wages paid to incarcerated individuals during the current
and previous calendar year.
(3) Number of non-incarcerated agricultural jobs affected by the use of prison
labor pursuant to this Article during the current and previous calendar year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 421-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 148-28. Sentencing prisoners incarcerated individuals to Central Prison; youthful
offenders.
When a sentenced offender is to be taken to the Central Prison at Raleigh, a sheriff or other
appropriate officer of the county shall cause such prisoner the incarcerated individual to be
delivered with the proper commitment papers to the warden of the Central Prison. A person under
16 years of age convicted of a felony shall not be imprisoned in the Central Prison at Raleigh
unless:unless both of the following circumstances exist:
(1) The person was convicted of a capital felony; orfelony.
(2) He The person has previously been imprisoned in a county jail or under the
authority of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction
upon conviction of a felony.
This provision shall not limit the authority of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction
from transferring a person under 16 years of age to Central Prison when in the Secretary's
determination this person would not benefit from confinement in separate facilities for youthful
offenders or when it has been determined that his the person's presence would be detrimental to
the implementation of programs designed for the benefit of other youthful offenders. Nor shall
this provision limit the authority of the judges of the superior courts of this State or the Secretary
of the Department of Adult Correction from committing or transferring a person under 16 years
of age to Central Prison for medical or psychiatric treatment.
"§ 148-29. Transportation of convicts incarcerated individuals to prison; reimbursement
to counties; sheriff's expense affidavit.
(a) The sheriff having in charge any prisoner incarcerated individual to be taken to the
State prison system shall send the prisoner incarcerated individual to the custody of the Division
of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction after sentencing and the disposal of all pending
charges against the prisoner, incarcerated individual, if no appeal has been taken. Beginning on
the day after the Division has been notified by the sheriff that a prisoner an incarcerated
individual is ready for transfer and the Division has informed the sheriff that bedspace is not
available for that prisoner, incarcerated individual, and continuing through the day the prisoner
incarcerated individual is received by the Division, the Division shall pay the county:county all
of the following:
(1) A standard sum set by the General Assembly in its appropriations acts for the
cost of providing food, clothing, personal items, supervision, and necessary
ordinary medical services to the prisoner incarcerated individual awaiting
transfer to the State prison system; andsystem.
(2) Extraordinary medical costs, as defined in G.S. 148-32.1(a), incurred by
prisoners incarcerated individuals awaiting transfer to the State prison system.
If the Division determines that bedspace is not available for a prisoner an incarcerated individual
after the sheriff has notified the Division that the prisoner incarcerated individual is ready for
transfer, reimbursement under this subsection shall be made beginning on the day after the sheriff
gave the notification.
(b) The sheriff having in charge any parolee or post-release supervisee to be taken to the
State prison system shall send the prisoner incarcerated individual to the custody of the Division
of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction after preliminary hearing held under
G.S. 15A-1368.6(b) or G.S. 15A-1376(b). Beginning on the day after the Division has been
notified by the sheriff that a prisoner an incarcerated individual is ready for transfer and the
Division has informed the sheriff that bedspace is not available for that prisoner, incarcerated
individual, and continuing through the day the prisoner incarcerated individual is received by the
Division, the Division shall pay the county:county all of the following:
(1) A standard sum set by the General Assembly in its appropriations acts for the
cost of providing food, clothing, personal items, supervision, and necessary
Senate Bill 421-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
ordinary medical services to the parolee or post-release supervisee awaiting
transfer to the State prison system; andsystem.
(2) Extraordinary medical costs, as defined in G.S. 148-32.1(a), incurred by
parolees or post-release supervisees awaiting transfer to the State prison
system.
If the Division determines that bedspace is not available for a prisoner an incarcerated individual
after the sheriff has notified the Division that the prisoner incarcerated individual is ready for
transfer, reimbursement under this subsection shall be made beginning on the day after the sheriff
gave the notification.
(c) The sheriff shall file with the board of commissioners of his the sheriff's county a
copy of his the sheriff's affidavit as to necessary guard, together with a copy of his the sheriff's
itemized account of expenses, both certified to by him the sheriff as true copies of those on file
in his the sheriff's office.
"§ 148-31. Maintenance of Central Prison; warden; powers and duties.
The Central Prison shall be maintained in such a manner as to conform to all the requirements
of Article XI of the State Constitution, relating to a State's prison. A suitable person shall be
appointed warden of the Central Prison, and he that person shall succeed to and be vested with
all the rights, duties, and powers heretofore vested by law in the superintendent of the State's
prison or the warden thereof with respect to capital punishment, or any matter of discipline of the
inmates incarcerated individuals of the prison not otherwise provided for in this Article.
"§ 148-32.1. Local confinement, costs, alternate facilities, parole, work release.
…
(b) In the event that the custodian of the local confinement facility certifies in writing to
the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the local confinement facility is located that
the local confinement facility is filled to capacity, or that the facility cannot reasonably
accommodate any more prisoners incarcerated individuals due to segregation requirements for
particular prisoners, incarcerated individuals or that the custodian anticipates, in light of local
experiences, an influx of temporary prisoners incarcerated individuals at that time, or if the local
confinement facility does not meet the minimum standards published pursuant to G.S. 153A-221,
any judge of the district court in the district court district as defined in G.S. 7A-133 where the
facility is located, or any superior court judge who has jurisdiction pursuant to G.S. 7A-47.1 or
G.S. 7A-48 in a district or set of districts as defined in G.S. 7A-41.1 where the facility is located
may order that a prisoner an incarcerated individual not housed pursuant to the Statewide
Misdemeanant Confinement Program established in subsection (b2) of this section be transferred
to any other qualified local confinement facility within that district or within another such district
where space is available, including a satellite jail unit operated pursuant to G.S. 153A-230.3 if
the prisoner incarcerated individual is a non-violent misdemeanant, which local facility shall
accept the transferred prisoner.incarcerated individual.
If no other local confinement facility is available and the reason for the requested transfer is
that the local confinement facility that would be required to house the prisoner incarcerated
individual cannot reasonably accommodate any more prisoners incarcerated individuals due to
segregation requirements for particular prisoners incarcerated individuals or the local facility
does not meet the minimum standards published pursuant to G.S. 153A-221, then the judge may
order that a prisoner an incarcerated individual not housed pursuant to the Statewide
Misdemeanant Confinement Program established in subsection (b2) of this section be transferred
to a facility operated by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction as
designated by the Division of Prisons. In no event, however, shall a prisoner an incarcerated
individual whose term of imprisonment is less than 30 days be assigned or ordered transferred to
a facility operated by the Division of Prisons.
…
Page 4 Senate Bill 421-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b2) The Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program is established. The Program
shall provide for the housing of misdemeanants from all counties serving sentences imposed for
a period of more than 90 days and for all sentences imposed for impaired driving under
G.S. 20-138.1, regardless of length. Those misdemeanants shall be confined in local confinement
facilities except as provided in subsections (b3) and (b4) of this section. The Program shall
address methods for the placement and transportation of inmates and reimbursement to counties
for the housing of those inmates. Any county that voluntarily agrees to house misdemeanants
from that county or from other counties pursuant to the Program may enter into a written
agreement with the Division of Prisons to do so.
The North Carolina Sheriffs' Association shall:
…
(2) Report no later than October 1 of each year to the chairs of the House of
Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and
the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety on the
Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program. The report shall include the
following with respect to the prior fiscal year:
a. The cost of housing prisoners incarcerated individuals by county under
the Program.
b. The cost of transporting prisoners incarcerated individuals by county
under the Program.
c. Personnel costs by county.
d. Inmate Incarcerated individual medical care costs by county.
e. The number of counties that volunteer to house inmates incarcerated
individuals under the Program.
…
(b3) The custodian of a local confinement facility may request a judicial order to transfer
a misdemeanant housed pursuant to the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program to a
facility operated by the Division of Prisons by certifying in writing to the clerk of the superior
court in the county in which the local confinement facility is located that one of the following
conditions is met:
(1) The misdemeanant poses a security risk because the misdemeanant:
…
c. Needs to be protected from other inmates, incarcerated individuals,
and the county jail facility cannot provide such that protection.
d. Is a female or a person 18 years of age or younger, and the county jail
facility does not have adequate housing for such prisoners.those
incarcerated individuals.
…
f. Otherwise poses an imminent danger to the staff of the county jail
facility or to other prisoners incarcerated individuals in the facility.
…
(3) The local confinement facility that would be required to house the prisoner
incarcerated individual (i) cannot reasonably accommodate any more
prisoners incarcerated individuals due to segregation requirements for
particular prisoners, incarcerated individuals, or the local facility does not
meet the minimum standards published pursuant to G.S. 153A-221, and (ii)
no other local confinement facility is available.
Upon receiving such request and certification in writing, any superior or district court judge
for the district in which the local confinement facility is located may, after ascertaining that the
request meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, order the
Senate Bill 421-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
misdemeanant transferred to a unit of the State prison system designated by the Secretary of the
Department of Adult Correction or the Secretary's authorized representative. Individuals meeting
the condition set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection may be ordered to be transferred for
an initial period not to exceed 30 days. The sheriff of the county from which the prisoner
incarcerated individual is removed shall be responsible for conveying the prisoner incarcerated
individual to the prison unit where the prisoner incarcerated individual is to be held and for
returning the prisoner incarcerated individual to the jail of the county from which the prisoner
incarcerated individual was transferred. The officer in charge of the prison unit designated by the
Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall receive custody of the prisoner
incarcerated individual in accordance with the terms of the order. Prior to the conclusion of the
30-day period, the Division of Prisons shall conduct an assessment of treatment and venue needs.
The assessment shall be conducted by the attending medical or mental health professional and
shall assess the medical and mental health needs of the prisoner incarcerated individual and make
a recommendation on whether the prisoner incarcerated individual should remain in the custody
of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction or if the prisoner incarcerated
individual should be returned to the custody of the county. To extend the order beyond the initial
30-day period, the sheriff shall provide the Division of Prisons assessment and any other relevant
information to the resident judge or the superior court or any judge holding superior court in the
district or any district court judge who shall determine whether to extend the transfer of the
prisoner incarcerated individual to a unit of the State prison system beyond the initial 30-day
period. If the judge determines that the prisoner incarcerated individual should remain in the
custody of the Division of Prisons, the judge shall renew the order and include a date certain for
review by the court. Prior to the date of review, the Division shall conduct a reassessment of
treatment and venue needs and the sheriff shall provide the reassessment and any other relevant
information to the court, as described in this subsection. If the judge determines that the prisoner
incarcerated individual should not remain in the custody of the Division of Prisons, the officer in
charge of the prison unit designated by the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall
release custody of the prisoner incarcerated individual in accordance with the court order and the
instructions of the attending medical or mental health professional. The Division of Prisons shall
be reimbursed from the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Fund for the costs of housing the
misdemeanant, including the care, supervision, and transportation of the misdemeanant.
…
(d) When a prisoner an incarcerated individual serving a sentence of 30 days or more in
a local confinement facility is placed on work release pursuant to a recommendation of the
sentencing court, the custodian of the facility shall forward the prisoner's incarcerated
individual's work-release earnings to the Division of Prisons, which shall disburse the earnings
as determined under G.S. 148-33.1(f). When a prisoner an incarcerated individual serving a
sentence of 30 days or more in a local confinement facility is placed on work release pursuant to
an order of the sentencing court, the custodian of the facility shall forward the prisoner's
incarcerated individual's work-release earnings to the clerk of the court that sentenced the
prisoner incarcerated individual or to the Division of Prisons, as provided in the prisoner's
incarcerated individual's commitment order. The clerk or the Division, as appropriate, shall
disburse the earnings as provided in the prisoner's incarcerated individual's commitment order.
Upon agreement between the Division of Prisons and the custodian of the local confinement
facility, however, the clerk may disburse to the local confinement facility the amount of the
earnings to be paid for the cost of the prisoner's incarcerated individual's keep, and that amount
shall be set off against the reimbursement to be paid by the Department to the local confinement
facility pursuant to G.S. 148-32.1(a).
(e) Upon entry of a prisoner an incarcerated individual serving a sentence of
imprisonment for impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.1 into a local confinement facility or to a
detention facility approved by the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety
Page 6 Senate Bill 421-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
pursuant to this section, the custodian of the local confinement facility or detention facility shall
forward to the Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission information pertaining to the
prisoner incarcerated individual so as to make him the individual eligible for parole consideration
pursuant to G.S. 15A-1371. Such This information shall include date of incarceration, jail credit,
and such other information as may be required by the Post-Release Supervision and Parole
Commission. The Post-Release Supervision and Parole Commission shall approve a form upon
which the custodian shall furnish this information, which form will be provided to the custodian
by the Division of Prisons.
"§ 148-32.4. Oversight of Department of Transportation and forestry work assignments.
(a) No later than March 1 and September 1 of each year, the Department of Adult
Correction, in consultation with the Department of Transportation (DOT) and the North Carolina
Forest Service, shall report to the Governor and General Assembly regarding the work of
incarcerated individuals on DOT and forestry work assignments, including, at a minimum, all of
the following information:
(1) Total hours worked by incarcerated individuals.
(2) Wages paid and any deductions applied.
(3) Estimated cost-savings to the State compared to civilian labor costs.
(4) Work site safety measures implemented.
(5) Skill certifications and job placements available to incarcerated workers upon
release.
(b) No incarcerated individual shall be compelled to work in road maintenance,
construction, or forestry without voluntary participation and fair wages.
(c) Any forestry, conservation, or wildfire suppression work performed by incarcerated
individuals shall provide industry-recognized certification opportunities in firefighting, land
management, and forestry to improve post-release employability.
(d) Medical assessments for DOT and forestry work shall include, at a minimum, each of
the following requirements:
(1) No incarcerated individual shall be assigned physically demanding labor
based on outward physical appearance alone.
(2) Eligibility for DOT and forestry work shall be based on a comprehensive
medical evaluation conducted by a licensed healthcare professional.
(e) The Prison Labor Oversight Board created by G.S. 148-32.5 shall conduct an annual
audit of DOT and forestry work programs to ensure compliance with fair labor standards,
workforce training goals, and public transparency requirements.
"§ 148-32.5. Independent oversights, public transparency, and worker protections.
(a) A Prison Labor Oversight Board shall be established within the Department of Adult
Correction to do each of the following:
(1) Conduct annual audits of all prison labor programs.
(2) Ensure compliance with PIECP standards and fair wage requirements.
(3) Investigate allegations of forced labor, unsafe working conditions, or wage
exploitation.
(b) No later than March 1 and September 1 of each year, the Department of Adult
Correction shall report to the Governor and General Assembly regarding the work of incarcerated
individuals, including, at a minimum, all of the following information:
(1) The types of work assignments offered to incarcerated individuals.
(2) The total revenue generated from prison labor contracts.
(3) Job placement rates of formerly incarcerated individuals who participated in
work programs.
(4) The overall impact of prison labor programs on North Carolina's economy and
workforce development efforts.
Senate Bill 421-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The Department of Adult Correction shall establish a Prison Labor Complaint
Hotline, allowing incarcerated individuals, their families, and advocates to anonymously report
labor violations, wage theft, or unsafe conditions related to the work of incarcerated individuals.
"§ 148-33.1. Sentencing, quartering, and control of prisoners incarcerated individuals with
work-release privileges.
(a) Whenever a person is sentenced to imprisonment for a term to be served in the State
prison system or a local confinement facility, the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction
may authorize the Director of Prisons or the custodian of the local confinement facility to grant
work-release privileges to any inmate incarcerated individual who is eligible for work release
and who has not been granted work-release privileges by order of the sentencing court. The
Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall authorize immediate work-release
privileges for any person serving a sentence not exceeding five years in the State prison system
and for whom the presiding judge shall have recommended work-release privileges when (i) it is
verified that appropriate employment for the person is available in an area where, in the judgment
of the Secretary, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction has facilities to
which the person may suitably be assigned, and (ii) custodial and correctional considerations
would not be adverse to releasing the person without supervision into the free community.
…
(c) The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall from time to
time, as the need becomes evident, designate and adapt facilities in the State prison system for
quartering prisoners incarcerated individuals with work-release privileges. No State or county
prisoner incarcerated individual shall be granted work-release privileges by the Director of
Prisons or the custodian of a local confinement facility until suitable facilities for quartering him
the incarcerated individual have been provided in the area where the prisoner incarcerated
individual has employment or the offer of employment.
(d) The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction is authorized and directed to
establish a work-release plan under which an eligible prisoner incarcerated individual may be
released from actual custody during the time necessary to proceed to the place of his the
incarcerated individual's employment, perform his the incarcerated individual's work, and return
to quarters designated by the prison authorities. If the prisoner incarcerated individual shall
violate any of the conditions prescribed by prison rules and regulations for the administration of
the work-release plan, then such prisoner the incarcerated individual may be withdrawn from
work-release privileges, and the prisoner incarcerated individual may be transferred to the
general prison population to serve out the remainder of his the incarcerated individual's sentence.
Rules and regulations for the administration of the work-release plan shall be established in the
same manner as other rules and regulations for the government of the State prison system.
(e) The State Department of Labor shall exercise the same supervision over conditions
of employment for persons working in the free community while serving sentences imposed
under this section as the Department does over conditions of employment for free persons.
(f) A prisoner An incarcerated individual who is convicted of a felony and who is granted
work-release privileges shall give his the incarcerated individual's work-release earnings, less
standard payroll deductions required by law, to the Division of Prisons of the Department of
Adult Correction. A prisoner An incarcerated individual who is convicted of a misdemeanor, is
committed to a local confinement facility, and is granted work-release privileges by order of the
sentencing court shall give his the incarcerated individual's work-release earnings, less standard
payroll deductions required by law, to the custodian of the local confinement facility. Other
misdemeanants granted work-release privileges shall give their work-release earnings, less
standard payroll deductions required by law, to the Division of Prisons of the Department of
Adult Correction. The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction or the
sentencing court, as appropriate, shall determine the amount to be deducted from a prisoner's an
incarcerated individual's work-release earnings to pay for the cost of the prisoner's incarcerated
Page 8 Senate Bill 421-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
individual's keep and to accumulate a reasonable sum to be paid the prisoner incarcerated
individual when he the individual is paroled or discharged from prison. The Division or
sentencing court shall also determine the amount to be disbursed by the Division or clerk of court,
as appropriate, for each of the following:
(1) To pay travel and other expenses of the prisoner incarcerated individual made
necessary by his employment;the incarcerated individual's employment.
(2) To provide a reasonable allowance to the prisoner incarcerated individual for
his the incarcerated individual's incidental personal expenses;expenses.
(3) To make payments for the support of the prisoner's incarcerated individual's
dependents in accordance with an order of a court of competent jurisdiction,
or in the absence of a court order, in accordance with a determination of
dependency status and need made by the local department of social services
in the county of North Carolina in which such the dependents reside;reside.
(3a) To make restitution or reparation as provided in G.S. 148-33.2.
(4) To comply with an order from any court of competent jurisdiction regarding
the payment of an obligation of the prisoner incarcerated individual in
connection with any judgment rendered by the court.
(5) To comply with a written request by the prisoner incarcerated individual to
withhold an amount, when the request has been granted by the Division or the
sentencing court, as appropriate.
Any balance of his the incarcerated individual's earnings remaining at the time the prisoner
incarcerated individual is released from prison shall be paid to him. the incarcerated individual.
The Social Services Commission is authorized to promulgate uniform rules and regulations
governing the duties of county social services departments under this section.
(g) No prisoner incarcerated individual employed in the free community under the
provisions of this section shall be deemed to be an agent, employee, or involuntary servant of the
State prison system while working in the free community or going to or from such that
employment.
(h) Any prisoner incarcerated individual employed under the provisions of this section
shall not be entitled to any benefits under Chapter 96 of the General Statutes entitled
"Employment Security" during the term of the sentence.
(i) No recommendation for work release shall be made at the time of sentencing in any
case in which the presiding judge shall suspend the imposition of sentence and place a convicted
person incarcerated individual on probation; however, if probation be subsequently revoked and
the active sentence of imprisonment executed, the court may at that time recommend work
release. Neither a recommendation for work release by the court or the decision of the Secretary
of the Department of Adult Correction to place a person on work release shall give rise to any
vested statutory right to an individual to be placed on or continued on work release.
(j) The provisions of subsections (f), (g), and (h) of this section shall also apply to
prisoners incarcerated individuals employed in private prison enterprises conducted pursuant to
G.S. 148-70.
"§ 148-33.2. Restitution by prisoners incarcerated individuals with work-release privileges.
(a) Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 474, s. 4.
(b) As a rehabilitative measure, the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction is
authorized to require any prisoner incarcerated individual granted work-release privileges to
make restitution or reparation to an aggrieved party from any earnings gained by the defendant
while on work release when the sentencing court recommends that restitution or reparation be
paid by the defendant out of any earnings gained by the defendant if he the defendant is granted
work-release privileges and out of other resources of the defendant, including all real and
personal property owned by the defendant and the income derived from such property. The
Secretary shall not be bound by such this recommendation, but if they elect the Secretary elects
Senate Bill 421-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
not to implement the recommendation, they the Secretary shall state in writing the reasons
therefor, for not doing so and shall forward the same to the sentencing court.
(c) When an active sentence is imposed, the court shall consider whether, as a
rehabilitative measure, it should recommend to the Secretary of the Department of Adult
Correction that restitution or reparation be made by the defendant out of any earnings gained by
the defendant if he the defendant is granted work-release privileges and out of other resources of
the defendant, including all real and personal property owned by the defendant, and income
derived from such that property. If the court determines that restitution or reparation should not
be recommended, it shall so indicate on the commitment. If, however, the court determines that
restitution or reparation should be recommended, the court shall make its recommendation a part
of the order committing the defendant to custody. The recommendation shall be in accordance
with the applicable provisions of G.S. 15A-1343(d) and Article 81C of Chapter 15A of the
General Statutes. If the offense is one in which there is evidence of physical, mental or sexual
abuse of a minor, the court may order the defendant to pay from work release earnings the cost
of rehabilitative treatment for the minor. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare
and distribute forms which provide ample space to make restitution or reparation
recommendations incident to commitments, which forms shall be conveniently structured to
enable the sentencing court to make its recommendation.
(d) The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall establish rules and
regulations to implement this section, which shall include adequate notice to the prisoner
incarcerated individual that the payment of restitution or reparation from any earnings gained by
the prisoner incarcerated individual while on work release is being considered as a condition of
any work-release privileges granted the prisoner, incarcerated individual, and opportunity for the
prisoner incarcerated individual to be heard. Such These rules and regulations shall also provide
additional methods whereby facts may be obtained to supplement the recommendation of the
sentencing court.
"§ 148-36. Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction to control classification and
operation of prison facilities.
All facilities established or acquired by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction shall be under the administrative control and direction of the Secretary of the
Department of Adult Correction, and operated under rules and regulations proposed by the
Secretary and adopted by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction as
provided in G.S. 148-11. Subject to such these rules and regulations, the Secretary shall classify
the facilities of the State prison system and develop a variety of programs so as to permit proper
segregation and treatment of prisoners incarcerated individuals according to the nature of the
offenses committed, the character and mental condition of the prisoners, incarcerated individuals,
and such other factors as should be considered in providing an individualized system of
discipline, care, and correctional treatment of persons committed to the Division. The Secretary
of the Department of Adult Correction, or his the Secretary's authorized representative, shall
designate the places of confinement where sentences to imprisonment in the State's prison system
shall be served. The Secretary or his the Secretary's representative may designate any available
facility appropriate for the individual in view of custodial and correctional considerations.
"§ 148-37. Additional facilities authorized; contractual arrangements.
(a) Subject to the provisions of G.S. 143-341, the Division of Prisons of the Department
of Adult Correction may establish additional facilities for use by the Division, such these
facilities to be either of a permanent type of construction or of a temporary or movable type as
the Division may find most advantageous to the particular needs, to the end that the prisoners
incarcerated individuals under its supervision may be so distributed throughout the State as to
facilitate individualization of treatment designed to prepare them the incarcerated individuals for
lawful living in the community where they are each is most likely to reside after their release
from prison. For this purpose, the Division may purchase or lease sites and suitable lands adjacent
Page 10 Senate Bill 421-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
thereto to those sites and erect necessary buildings thereon, on those sites and lands, or purchase
or lease existing facilities, all within the limits of allotments as approved by the Department of
Administration.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may contract with the proper
official of the United States or of any county or city of this State for the confinement of federal
prisoners incarcerated individuals after they have been sentenced, county, or city prisoners
incarcerated individuals in facilities of the State prison system or for the confinement of State
prisoners incarcerated individuals in any county or any city facility located in North Carolina, or
any facility of the United States Bureau of Prisons, when to do so would most economically and
effectively promote the purposes served by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction. Except as otherwise provided, any contract made under the authority of this
subsection shall be for a period of not more than two years, and shall be renewable from time to
time for a period not to exceed two years. Contracts made under the authority of this subsection
for the confinement of State prisoners incarcerated individuals in local or district confinement
facilities may be for a period of not more than 10 years and renewable from time to time for a
period not to exceed 10 years, and shall be subject to the approval of the Council of State and the
Department of Administration after consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations. Contracts for receiving federal, county and city prisoners incarcerated
individuals shall provide for reimbursing the State in full for all costs involved. The financial
provisions shall have the approval of the Department of Administration before the contract is
executed. Payments received under such these contracts shall be deposited in the State treasury
for the use of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. Such These
payments are hereby shall be appropriated to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction as a supplementary fund to compensate for the additional care and maintenance of
such the prisoners as are received under such these contracts.
…
(c) In addition to the authority contained in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, and in
addition to the contracts ratified by subsection (f) of this section, the Secretary of the Department
of Adult Correction may enter into contracts with any public entity or any private nonprofit or
for-profit firms for the confinement and care of State prisoners incarcerated individuals in any
out-of-state correctional facility when to do so would most economically and effectively promote
the purposes served by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. Contracts
entered into under the authority of this subsection shall be for a period not to exceed two years
and shall be renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed two years. Prisoners
Incarcerated individuals may be sent to out-of-state correctional facilities only when there are no
available facilities in this State within the State prison system to appropriately house those
prisoners. incarcerated individuals. Any contract made under the authority of this subsection shall
be approved by the Department of Administration before the contract is executed. Before
expending more than the amount specifically appropriated by the General Assembly for the
out-of-state housing of inmates, incarcerated individuals, the Division shall obtain the approval
of the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and shall report such
expenditures to the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Committees, the Chairs of
the Senate and House Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety, and the Chairs
of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.
(d) Prisoners Incarcerated individuals confined in out-of-state correctional facilities
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall remain subject to the rules adopted for the conduct
of persons committed to the State prison system. The rules regarding good time and gain time,
discipline, classification, extension of the limits of confinement, transfers, housing arrangements,
and eligibility for parole shall apply to inmates incarcerated individuals housed in those
out-of-state correctional facilities. The operators of those out-of-state correctional facilities may
promulgate any other rules as may be necessary for the operation of those facilities with the
Senate Bill 421-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
written approval of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction. Custodial officials
employed by an out-of-state correctional facility are agents of the Secretary of the Department
of Adult Correction and may use those procedures for use of force authorized by the Secretary
of the Department of Adult Correction not inconsistent with the laws of the State of situs of the
facility to defend themselves, to enforce the observance of discipline in compliance with
correctional facility rules, to secure the person of a prisoner, an incarcerated individual, and to
prevent escape. Prisoners Incarcerated individuals confined to out-of-state correctional facilities
may be required to perform reasonable work assignments within those facilities. Private firms
under subsection (c) of this section shall employ inmate disciplinary and grievance policies of
the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.
…
(g) The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may contract with private
for-profit or nonprofit firms for the provision and operation of four or more confinement facilities
totaling up to 2,000 beds in the State to house State prisoners incarcerated individuals when to
do so would most economically and effectively promote the purposes served by the Division of
Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction. This 2,000-bed limitation shall not apply to the
500 beds in private substance abuse treatment centers authorized by the General Assembly prior
to July 1, 1995. Whenever the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction
determines that new prison facilities are required in addition to existing and planned facilities,
the Division may contract for any remaining beds authorized by this section before constructing
State-operated facilities.
Contracts entered under the authority of this subsection shall be for a period not to exceed 10
years, shall be renewable from time to time for a period not to exceed 10 years. The Secretary of
the Department of Adult Correction shall enter contracts under this subsection only if funds are
appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly. Contracts entered under the authority of
this subsection may be subject to any requirements for the location of the confinement facilities
set forth by the General Assembly in appropriating those funds.
Once the Division has made a determination to contract for additional private prison beds, it
shall issue a request for proposals within 30 days of the decision. The request for proposals shall
require bids to be submitted within two months, and the Division shall award contracts at the
earliest practicable date after the submission of bids. The Secretary of the Department of Adult
Correction, in consultation with the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Justice and Public Safety and the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees
on Justice and Public Safety, shall make recommendations to the State Purchasing Officer on the
final award decision. The State Purchasing Officer shall make the final award decision, and the
contract shall then be subject to the approval of the Council of State after consultation with the
Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.
Contracts made under the authority of this subsection may provide the State with an option
to purchase the confinement facility or may provide for the purchase of the confinement facility
by the State. Contracts made under the authority of this subsection shall state that plans and
specifications for private confinement facilities shall be furnished to and reviewed by the Office
of State Construction. The Office of State Construction shall inspect and review each project
during construction to ensure that the project is suitable for habitation and to determine whether
the project would be suitable for future acquisition by the State. All contracts for the housing of
State prisoners incarcerated individuals in private confinement facilities shall require a minimum
of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of occurrence-based liability insurance and shall hold the
State harmless and provide reimbursement for all liability arising out of actions caused by
operations and employees of the private confinement facility.
Prisoners Incarcerated individuals housed in private confinement facilities pursuant to this
subsection shall remain subject to the rules adopted for the conduct of persons committed to the
State prison system. The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction may review and
Page 12 Senate Bill 421-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
approve the design and construction of private confinement facilities before housing State
prisoners incarcerated individuals in these facilities. The rules regarding good time, gain time,
and earned credits, discipline, classification, extension of the limits of confinement, transfers,
housing arrangements, and eligibility for parole shall apply to inmates incarcerated individuals
housed in private confinement facilities pursuant to this subsection. The operators of private
confinement facilities may adopt any other rules as may be necessary for the operation of those
facilities with the written approval of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction.
Custodial officials employed by a private confinement facility are agents of the Secretary of the
Department of Adult Correction and may use those procedures for use of force authorized by the
Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction to defend themselves, to enforce the observance
of discipline in compliance with confinement facility rules, to secure the person of a prisoner, an
incarcerated individual, and to prevent escape. Private firms under this subsection shall employ
inmate disciplinary and grievance policies of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction.
…
(i) The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall make a written
report no later than March 1 of every year, beginning in 1997, on the substance of all outstanding
contracts for the housing of State prisoners incarcerated individuals entered into under the
authority of this section. The report shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Justice and Public Safety.
"§ 148-37.1. Prohibition on private prisons housing out-of-state inmates.incarcerated
individuals.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section or authorized by North Carolina law, no
municipality, county, or private entity may authorize, construct, own, or operate any type of
correctional facility for the confinement of inmates incarcerated individuals serving sentences
for violation of the laws of a jurisdiction other than North Carolina.
(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to facilities owned or operated by the
federal government and used exclusively for the confinement of inmates incarcerated individuals
serving sentences for violation of federal law, but only to the extent that such those facilities are
not subject to restriction by the states under the provisions of the United States Constitution.
"§ 148-37.3. Authority of private correctional officers employed pursuant to a contract
with the Federal Bureau of Prisons.
(a) Correctional officers and security supervisors employed at private correctional
facilities pursuant to a contract between their employer and the Federal Bureau of Prisons may,
in the course of their employment as correctional officers or security supervisors, use necessary
force and make arrests consistent with the laws applicable to the Division of Prisons of the
Department of Adult Correction, which force shall not exceed that authorized to Division of
Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction officers, provided that the employment policies
of such those private corporations meet the same minimum standards and practices followed by
the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in employing its correctional
personnel, and if:if either of the following circumstances applies:
(1) Those correctional officers and security supervisors have been certified as
correctional officers as provided under Article 1 of Chapter 17C of the
General Statutes; orStatutes.
(2) Those correctional officers and security supervisors employed by the private
corporation at the facility have completed a training curriculum that meets or
exceeds the standards required by the North Carolina Criminal Justice
Education and Training Standards Commission for correctional personnel.
…
(c) Any private corporation described in subsection (a) of this section shall reimburse the
State and any county or other law enforcement agency for the full cost of any additional expenses
Senate Bill 421-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
incurred by the State or the county or other law enforcement agency in connection with the
pursuit and apprehension of an escaped inmate incarcerated individual from the facility.
In the event of an escape from the facility, any private corporation described in subsection
(a) of this section shall immediately notify the sheriff in the county in which the facility is located,
who shall cause an immediate entry into the Department of Public Safety's Criminal Information
Network. The sheriff of the county in which the facility is located shall be the lead law
enforcement officer in connection with the pursuit and apprehension of an escaped inmate
incarcerated individual from the facility.
…
"§ 148-40. Recapture of escaped prisoners.incarcerated individuals.
The rules and regulations for the government of the State prison system may provide for the
recapture of convicts incarcerated individuals that may escape, or any convicts incarcerated
individuals that may have escaped from the State's prison or prison camps, or county road camps
of this State, and the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may pay to any
person recapturing an escaped convict such incarcerated individual a reward or expense of
recapture as the regulations may provide. Any citizen of North Carolina shall have authority to
apprehend any convict incarcerated individual who may escape before the expiration of the
convict's incarcerated individual's term of imprisonment whether the convict incarcerated
individual be guilty of a felony or misdemeanor, and retain the convict incarcerated individual in
custody and deliver the convict incarcerated individual to the Division of Prisons of the
Department of Adult Correction.
"§ 148-41. Recapture of escaping prisoners; incarcerated individuals; reward.
The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall use every means possible to
recapture, regardless of expense, any prisoners incarcerated individuals escaping from or leaving
without permission any of the State prisons, camps, or farms. When any person who has been
confined or placed to work escapes from the State prison system, the Secretary shall immediately
notify the Governor, and accompany the notice with a full description of the escaped prisoner,
incarcerated individual, together with such information as will aid in the recapture. The Governor
may offer such rewards as he the Governor may deem desirable and necessary for the recapture
and return to the State prison system of any person who may escape or who heretofore has
escaped therefrom. Such escaped. The reward earned shall be paid by warrant of the Division of
Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and accounted for as a part of the expense of
maintaining the State's prisons.
"§ 148-44. Separation as to sex.
The Department shall provide quarters for female prisoners incarcerated individuals separate
from those for male prisoners.incarcerated individuals.
"§ 148-45. Escaping or attempting escape from State prison system; failure of conditionally
and temporarily released prisoners incarcerated individuals and certain
youthful offenders to return to custody of Division of Prisons of the Department
of Adult Correction.
(a) Any person in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction in any of the classifications hereinafter set forth in this subsection who shall escape
from the State prison system, shall for the first such offense, except as provided in subsection (g)
of this section, be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor:
(1) A prisoner An incarcerated individual serving a sentence imposed upon
conviction of a misdemeanor;misdemeanor.
(2) A person who has been charged with a misdemeanor and who has been
committed to the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of
Adult Correction under the provisions of G.S. 162-39;G.S. 162-39.
…
Page 14 Senate Bill 421-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Any person in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult
Correction, in any of the classifications hereinafter set forth, forth in this subsection, who shall
escape from the State prison system, shall, except as provided in subsection (g) of this section,
be punished as a Class H felon:
(1) A prisoner An incarcerated individual serving a sentence imposed upon
conviction of a felony;felony.
(2) A person who has been charged with a felony and who has been committed to
the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction
under the provisions of G.S. 162-39;G.S. 162-39.
…
(4) A person who shall have been convicted of a felony and who shall have been
committed to the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction
for presentence diagnostic study under the provisions of G.S. 15A-1332(c);
orG.S. 15A-1332(c).
(5) Any person previously convicted of escaping or attempting to escape from the
State prison system.
…
(f) Any person convicted of an escape or attempt to escape classified as a felony by this
section shall be immediately classified and treated as a convicted felon even if such the person
has time remaining to be served in the State prison system on a sentence or sentences imposed
upon conviction of a misdemeanor or misdemeanors.
(g) (1) Any person convicted and in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the
Department of Adult Correction and ordered or otherwise assigned to work
under the work-release program, G.S. 148-33.1, or any convicted person in
the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction
and temporarily allowed to leave a place of confinement by the Secretary of
the Department of Adult Correction or his the Secretary's designee or other
authority of law, who shall fail to return to the custody of the Division of
Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, shall be guilty of the crime of
escape and subject to the applicable provisions of this section and shall be
deemed an escapee. For the purpose of this subsection, escape is defined to
include, but is not restricted to, willful failure to return to an appointed place
and at an appointed time as ordered.
(2) If a person, who would otherwise be guilty of a first violation of
G.S. 148-45(g)(1), voluntarily returns to his place of confinement within 24
hours of the time at which he the person was ordered to return, such that person
shall not be charged with an escape as provided in this section but shall be
subject to such administrative action as may be deemed appropriate for an
escapee by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction;
said that escapee shall not be allowed to be placed on work release for a
four-month period or for the balance of his the escapee's term if less than four
months; provided, however, that if such that person commits a subsequent
violation of this section then such that person shall be charged with that
offense and, if convicted, punished under the provisions of this section.
"§ 148-46. Degree of protection against violence allowed.
(a) When any prisoner, incarcerated individual, or several combined combined, shall
offer violence to any officer, overseer, or correctional officer, or to any fellow prisoner,
incarcerated individual, or attempt to do any injury to the prison building, or to any workshop,
or other equipment, or shall attempt to escape, or shall resist, or disobey any lawful command,
the officer, overseer, or correctional officer shall use any means necessary to defend himself, or
Senate Bill 421-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to enforce the observance of discipline, or to secure the person of the offender, and to prevent an
escape.
(b) A misdemeanor prisoner incarcerated individual classified and treated as a convicted
felon as the result of a consecutive felony sentence or sentences, or a convicted felon placed in
the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction pending the outcome of an
appeal, or a defendant charged with a felony or felonies and placed in the custody of the Secretary
of the Department of Adult Correction pending trial, shall be considered as a convicted felon in
the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction against whom any means
reasonably necessary, including deadly force, may be used to prevent an escape.
"§ 148-46.1. Inflicting or assisting in infliction of self injury to prisoner an incarcerated
individual resulting in incapacity to perform assigned duties.
Any person serving a sentence or sentences within the State prison system who, during the
term of such imprisonment, willfully and intentionally inflicts upon himself any injury resulting
in a permanent or temporary incapacity to perform work or duties assigned to him that person by
the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, or any prisoner incarcerated
individual who aids or abets any other prisoner incarcerated individual in the commission of such
offense, shall be punished as a Class H felon.
"§ 148-46.2. Procedure when consent is refused by prisoner.an incarcerated individual.
When the Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction finds as a fact that the injury to
any prisoner incarcerated individual was willfully and intentionally self-inflicted and that an
operation or treatment is necessary for the preservation or restoration of the health of the prisoner
incarcerated individual and that the prisoner incarcerated individual is competent to act for
himself or herself; and that attempts have been made to obtain consent for the proposed operation
or treatment but such the consent was refused, and the findings have been reduced to writing and
entered into the prisoner's incarcerated individual's records as a permanent part thereof, of those
records, then the chief medical officer of the prison hospital or prison institution shall be
authorized to give or withhold, on behalf of the prisoner, incarcerated individual, consent to the
operation or treatment.
In all cases coming under the provisions of this section, the medical staff of the hospital or
institution shall keep a careful and complete medical record of the treatment and surgical
procedures undertaken. The record shall be signed by the chief medical officer of the hospital or
institution and the surgeon performing any surgery. Any treatment of self-inflicted injuries shall
also be subject to the provisions of G.S. 90-21.13 and G.S. 90-21.16.
"§ 148-47. Disposition of child born of female prisoner.incarcerated individual.
Any child born of a female prisoner incarcerated individual while she the individual is in
custody shall as soon as practicable be surrendered to the director of social services of the county
wherein where the child was born upon a proper order of the domestic relations court or juvenile
court of said that county affecting the custody of said the child. When it appears to be for the best
interest of the child, the court may place custody beyond the geographical bounds of Wake
County: Provided, however, that all subsequent proceedings and orders affecting custody of said
the child shall be within the jurisdiction of the proper court of the county where the infant is
residing at the time such the proceeding is commenced or such the order is sought: Provided,
further, that nothing in this section shall affect the right of the mother to consent to the adoption
of her the child nor shall the right of the mother to place her the child with the legal father or
other suitable relative be affected by the provisions of this section.
"§ 148-48. Parole powers of Parole Commission unaffected.
Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to limit or restrict the power of the Parole
Commission to parole prisoners incarcerated individuals under such conditions as it may impose
or prevent the reimprisonment of such prisoners incarcerated individuals upon violation of the
conditions of such that parole, as now provided by law.
…."
Page 16 Senate Bill 421-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional or
invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 421-First Edition Page 17